Maryland, session 2026, HB1328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
[5–310.1.
(a) The Interagency Commission shall adopt facility mapping standards for the
uniform mapping of the physical attributes of public schools in the State.
(b) Local school systems shall:
(1) Cooperate with the Interagency Commission in the development of
uniform mapping standards; and
(2) Contribute data as requested by the Interagency Commission.]
[7–1510.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Program” means the School Mapping Data Program.
(3) “School mapping data” means data in an electronic or digital format to
assist first responders in responding to emergencies at a school.
(b) There is a School Mapping Data Program in the Center.
(c) The purpose of the Program is to provide funds to local school systems to
produce school mapping data for each public school in the county, including public charter
schools.
(d) (1) Each local school system, in consultation with the local law enforcement
agency, may apply to the Subcabinet for funds to produce school mapping data.
(2) School mapping data produced with funding from the Program shall
comply with the facility mapping standards developed by the Interagency Commission on
School Construction under § 5–310.1 of this article.
(3) The Center shall work in consultation with the Interagency
Commission on School Construction to ensure that school mapping data produced with

HOUSE BILL 1328 3
funding from the Program meets the facility mapping standards developed under § 5–310.1
of this article.
(4) At a minimum, school mapping data produced with funding from the
Program shall:
(i) Be compatible with software platforms used by the school and
local, State, and federal public safety agencies that provide emergency services to the school
without requiring the purchase of additional software or charging a fee to view or access
the data;
(ii) Be in a printable format and, if requested, be in a digital file
format that can be integrated into interactive mobile platforms;
(iii) Be verified for accuracy by a walk–through of the school
buildings and grounds;
(iv) Be oriented true north;
(v) Be overlaid on current aerial imagery;
(vi) Contain site–specific labeling that matches the structure of
school buildings, including:
1. Room labels;
2. Hallway names;
3. External door or stairwell numbers; and
4. Locations of:
A. Hazards;
B. Critical utility locations;
C. Key boxes; and
D. Automated external defibrillators and trauma kits;
(vii) Contain site–specific labeling that matches the school grounds,
including:
1. Parking areas;
2. Athletic fields;

HOUSE BILL 1328
3. Surrounding roads; and
4. Neighboring properties; and
(viii) Be overlaid with gridded x and y coordinates.]
7–1512.
(a) There is a Safe Schools Fund.
(b) The purpose of the Fund is to provide grants to local school systems to enhance
school safety.
(c) The Subcabinet shall administer the Fund.
(f) Except as provided in subsections (g) and (h) of this section, the Fund may be
used only to provide grants to local school systems to enhance school safety, including:
(1) Conducting training for students and school personnel on de–escalation
of situations and identifying and reporting behaviors of concern;
(2) Conducting training of assessment teams;
(3) Conducting school safety evaluations;
(4) Establishing formal and anonymous mechanisms for reporting safety
concerns;
(5) Reimbursing local law enforcement agencies for school resource officer
training provided by the Center;
(6) Enrolling school security employees in training provided by the Center;
(7) Developing plans to deliver school–based behavioral health and other
wraparound services to students who exhibit behaviors of concern, including establishing
systems to maximize external funding for services;
(8) Outreach to the broader school community to improve school safety,
including to heighten awareness of existing mental health services and other services;
(9) Providing information to students and parents on traveling safely to
and from school, including data related to bus and pedestrian safety, strategies for ensuring
personal safety, efforts of the local school system to improve safety, and information on
available options for reporting incidents and concerns; and

HOUSE BILL 1328 5
(10) Assisting local school systems to improve and monitor traffic control
measures in the immediate vicinity of schools to reduce the potential for pedestrian and
vehicle accidents.
(h) The Subcabinet may use the Fund to provide funding to [local school systems]
PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCIES in accordance with [§ 7–1510.1 of this subtitle] TITLE 2,
SUBTITLE 8 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
Article – Public Safety
SUBTITLE 8. SCHOOL MAPPING DATA PROGRAM.
2–801.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE SCHOOL MAPPING DATA PROGRAM.
(C) “PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCY” MEANS A STATE, COUNTY, MUNICIPAL, OR
REGIONAL AGENCY THAT PROVIDES FIRE FIGHTING, LAW ENFORCEMENT, MEDICAL,
AND OTHER EMERGENCY SERVICES.
(D) (1) “SCHOOL MAPPING DATA” MEANS DETAILED AND VERIFIED
GEOGRAPHICAL AND STRUCTURAL DATA OF SCHOOL BUILDINGS AND GROUNDS TO
ASSIST PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCIES IN RESPONDING TO EMERGENCIES AT A SCHOOL.
(2) “SCHOOL MAPPING DATA” INCLUDES:
(I) FLOOR PLANS;
(II) AERIAL IMAGERY; AND
(III) SITE–SPECIFIC LABELS IDENTIFYING ROOMS, HALLWAYS,
AND STAIRWELLS.
(E) “SOFTWARE PLATFORM” MEANS DIGITAL TOOLS AND SYSTEMS A
PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCY USES TO ACCESS, SHARE, AND USE SCHOOL MAPPING DATA
AND RELATED EMERGENCY INFORMATION.
(F) “VERIFIED DATA” MEANS DATA PHYSICALLY INSPECTED AND
CONFIRMED FOR ACCURACY BY AN ON–SITE REVIEW OF SCHOOL BUILDINGS AND
GROUNDS BY AN ENTITY RESPONSIBLE FOR PRODUCING SCHOOL MAPPING DATA.

HOUSE BILL 1328
2–802.
(A) THERE IS A SCHOOL MAPPING DATA PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE OVERSIGHT OF, AND
TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO, PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCIES THAT RECEIVE FUNDS FROM
THE SAFE SCHOOLS FUND TO PRODUCE SCHOOL MAPPING DATA FOR EACH PUBLIC
SCHOOL IN A COUNTY, INCLUDING PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOLS, TO FACILITATE
EFFICIENT AND EFFECTIVE EMERGENCY RESPONSE BY PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCIES.
(C) THE PROGRAM SHALL ENSURE THAT SCHOOL MAPPING DATA
PRODUCED BY A PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCY MEETS OR EXCEEDS SCHOOL MAPPING
DATA STANDARDS ESTABLISHED AND UPDATED BY THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION
ON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION.
2–803.
(A) EACH LOCAL PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCY MAY APPLY TO THE SCHOOL
SAFETY SUBCABINET UNDER § 7–1512 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE FOR FUNDS TO
PRODUCE SCHOOL MAPPING DATA OF A LOCAL PUBLIC SCHOOL OVER WHICH THE
PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCY HAS JURISDICTION.
(B) A LOCAL PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCY, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
PROGRAM, SHALL ENSURE THAT SCHOOL MAPPING DATA MEETS STANDARDS
ESTABLISHED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) AT A MINIMUM, SCHOOL MAPPING DATA PRODUCED BY A PUBLIC
SAFETY AGENCY WITH FUNDING FROM THE SAFE SCHOOLS FUND SHALL:
(1) BE COMPATIBLE WITH SOFTWARE PLATFORMS USED BY THE
SCHOOL AND LOCAL, STATE, AND FEDERAL PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCIES THAT
PROVIDE EMERGENCY SERVICES TO THE SCHOOL WITHOUT REQUIRING THE
PURCHASE OF ADDITIONAL SOFTWARE OR CHARGING A FEE TO VIEW OR ACCESS THE
DATA;
(2) BE IN A PRINTABLE FORMAT AND, IF REQUESTED, BE IN A DIGITAL
FILE FORMAT THAT CAN BE INTEGRATED INTO INTERACTIVE MOBILE PLATFORMS;
(3) BE VERIFIED FOR ACCURACY BY A WALK–THROUGH OF THE
SCHOOL BUILDINGS AND GROUNDS;
(4) BE ORIENTED TRUE NORTH;
(5) BE OVERLAID ON CURRENT AERIAL IMAGERY;

HOUSE BILL 1328 7
(6) CONTAIN SITE–SPECIFIC LABELING THAT MATCHES THE
STRUCTURE OF SCHOOL BUILDINGS, INCLUDING:
(I) ROOM LABELS;
(II) HALLWAY NAMES;
(III) EXTERNAL DOOR OR STAIRWELL NUMBERS; AND
(IV) LOCATIONS OF:
1. HAZARDS;
2. CRITICAL UTILITY LOCATIONS;
3. KEY BOXES; AND
4. AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATORS AND
TRAUMA KITS;
(7) CONTAIN SITE–SPECIFIC LABELING THAT MATCHES THE SCHOOL
GROUNDS, INCLUDING:
(I) PARKING AREAS;
(II) ATHLETIC FIELDS;
(III) SURROUNDING ROADS; AND
(IV) NEIGHBORING PROPERTIES; AND
(8) BE OVERLAID WITH GRIDDED X AND Y COORDINATES.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.